South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3341.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 21, Title 31 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 31-21-65.  (A) For purposes of this section, "race, color, or national origin" include characteristics associated with race, color, and national origin, including, but not limited to, skin color, facial features, hair texture, and natural hairstyles. (B)  For purposes of applying the provisions of this chapter, it is unlawful and against public policy of this State to discriminate in matters involving housing on the basis of race, color, or national origin as defined in subsection (A). SECTION 2.  Article 1, Chapter 63, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-63-41.  (A) For purposes this section, "race, color, or national origin" includes characteristics associated with race, color, and national origin, including, but not limited to, skin color, facial features, hair texture, and natural hairstyles. (B) In school or school administrative matters, based on a provision of law, policy, rule, or guideline applicable to the institution, it is unlawful and against the public policy of this State to discriminate on the basis of race, color, or national origin as defined in subsection (A) when applying a provision, policy, rule, or guideline. (C) An educational organization may not be held liable for unlawful race, color, or national origin discrimination where the organization demonstrates that the reasonable regulation of an impermissible characteristic is necessary to the health and safety of students and that the organization engages in good faith efforts to accommodate the student. SECTION 3.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 45 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 45-9-11. (A) For purposes of this section, "race, color, or national origin" includes characteristics associated with race, color and national origin including, but not limited to, skin color, facial features, hair texture, and natural hairstyles. (B)  For purposes of applying the provisions of this chapter, it is unlawful and against public policy of this State to discriminate in matters involving public accommodations on the basis of race, color, or national origin as defined in subsection (A). SECTION 4.  Section 1-13-30 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (V) "Race, color, or national origin" includes characteristics associated with race, color and national origin, including, but not limited to, skin color, facial features, hair texture, and natural hairstyles. SECTION 5.  Section 1-13-80(I) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (14) A covered employer may not be held liable for unlawful race, color, or national origin discrimination where the employer demonstrates that the reasonable regulation of an impermissible characteristic is necessary to the health and safety of the employee and that the employer engages in good faith efforts to accommodate the applicant or employee. SECTION 6.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----